Maryland, session 2026, HB1255.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The General Assembly may authorize, by law, the State Lottery and Gaming
Control Commission to issue a license to offer Internet gaming in the State.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, legislation enacted by the
General Assembly to implement the provisions of this Act shall include the criteria for
eligible applications for a licensee and specifications of the permissible forms and means of
conduct of Internet gaming.
(2) The State Lottery and Gaming Control Commission may issue a license
to offer Internet gaming in the State only to:
(i) the holder of a video lottery operation license, as defined under
§ 9–1A–01 of the State Government Article; and
(ii) subject to additional eligibility criteria specified by law in
accordance with paragraph (1) of this subsection, an entity under contract with the holder
of a video lottery operation license.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1255*

HOUSE BILL 1255
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if the voters of this State
adopt a referendum that authorizes Internet gaming in the State, the State’s share of
revenues generated by Internet gaming shall be used for dedicated purposes including the
funding of public education.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the provisions of Section 1 of
this Act, which authorize the General Assembly to authorize, by law, the State Lottery and
Gaming Control Commission to issue Internet gaming licenses to certain licensees in the
State, are subject to a referendum of the qualified voters of the State as provided in Section
4 of this Act, and on voter approval of this Act at the general election to be held in November
2026, legislation shall be required to provide for the operation, regulation, and disposition
of proceeds of Internet gaming in the State.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) In accordance with Article XIX, § 1(e) of the Maryland Constitution, before
Section 1 of this Act, which authorizes additional forms or expansion of commercial gaming,
becomes effective, a question substantially similar to the following shall be submitted to a
referendum of the qualified voters of the State at the general election to be held in
November 2026:
“Do you favor the expansion of commercial gaming in the State of Maryland to
authorize Internet gaming for dedicated purposes including the funding of public
education?”
(b) The State Board of Elections shall do those things necessary and proper to
provide for and hold the referendum required by this section. If a majority of votes cast on
the question are “For the referred law”, this Act shall become effective on the 30th day
following the official canvass of voters for the referendum, but if a majority of the votes cast
on the question are “Against the referred law”, this Act, with no further action required by
the General Assembly, shall be null and void.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to the provisions of
Section 4 of this Act and for the sole purpose of providing for the referendum required by
Section 4 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.